src-fst-morphology-stems-verbs.lexc.md
# Cornish Verb stems

## The regular verb system -- an overview:

This shows two version of the analysis, one from 2009 (for reference) and
one from 2020 (the current one).

### For reference: This was the first version of the model (2009)
vb1-vb5 are declension classes.
* vb1) -a     no i-Umlaut im Paradima
* vb2) -ya    ya-Verbs
* vb3) -es/-i i-Umlaut im Paradigma
* vb4) -he    he-Verbs
* vb5) -el/-i -C[l|n|m](r)-Verben
* And finally the irregulars: Suppletion im Paradigma

### The 2020 version of the model:
* vb1 -a     (= v1 above)
* vbya -ya   (= v2 above)
* vbi -i     (= v3 above)
* vbhe -e    (= v4 above)
* vb the rest (= ??? above)
* Irregulars (the final cat above)

2020 verbs were added as follows:
verbs with -ya, -i, -he infinitive to vbya, vbi, vbye
verbs in -a other than -ya to vb1
all other verbs to vb
TODO: Go through the new verbs (at the end of this file)

## Umlaut class verbs

* u0. Verbs that never have Umlaut?
* u1. Verbs that only have umlaut before an ending that contains <i>, <y>, <owgh> or imperative <ewgh>.
* u2. Verbs that have umlaut wherever (1) does, but also have the imperfect tense in <-yn, -ys, -i, -yn>.
* u3. Verbs that have umlaut wherever (2) does (including the imperfect tense rule), and also have the 3s pret in <-is>.
* u1 This means VA before suffixes containing <i y owgh> or imperative <ewgh>
* u2 This means VA before everything in Umlaut = 1, + the following: 3s and 3p present indicative, 3s and 3p imperative
* u3

Todo:
* for each stem class, split in umlaut type and make sub-contlexes.
* In theory, this gives us 6x4 = 24 verbal continuation lexica.

It is fortunately easier than that:
* -el verbs are always type 3: v5-u3
* some -i verbs are type 3: v3-u3
* and the rest are type 2: v3-u2
* he-verbs are all type 2: v4-u2

## The verb lexicon

**LEXICON Verb** lists all the verbs
* AUX ; = this one entry points to the AUX lexicon in the affixes catalogue

* erhi:arha ERHI "command, order, require, bid" ; = some example entries
* tava:tav TAVA "touch, stroke " ; = 
* anomdhiskwedhes:anomdhiskwedh vb "disappear" ; = 
* aras:ar vb "plough" ; = 
* argeles:argel vb "sequester" ; = 
* arvedh:arvedh vb "affront, harass, browbeat" ; = 
* batalyas:bataly vb "fight" ; = 
* bryjon:bryjon vb "boil" ; = 
* gortos:gortos vb "await, wait for, remain, stay" ; = 
* gwrias:gwri vb "sew, stitch" ; = 

Verbs from the 2020 dictionary

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-cor/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc)</small>

---
